Utah statutes.
31A-23a-105.   General requirements for individual and agency license issuance and renewal.

(1) (a)  The commissioner shall issue or renew a license to a person described in Subsection (1)(b) to act as:

(i)  a producer;

(ii)  a surplus lines producer;

(iii)  a limited line producer;

(iv)  a consultant;

(v)  a managing general agent; or

(vi)  a reinsurance intermediary.

(b)  The commissioner shall issue or renew a license under Subsection (1)(a) to a person who, as to the license type and line of authority classification applied for under Section 31A-23a-106:

(i)  satisfies the application requirements under Section 31A-23a-104;

(ii)  satisfies the character requirements under Section 31A-23a-107;

(iii)  satisfies any applicable continuing education requirements under Section 31A-23a-202;

(iv)  satisfies any applicable examination requirements under Section 31A-23a-108;

(v)  satisfies any applicable training period requirements under Section 31A-23a-203;

(vi)  if an applicant for a resident individual producer license, certifies that, to the extent applicable, the applicant:

(A)  is in compliance with Section 31A-23a-203.5; and

(B)  will maintain compliance with Section 31A-23a-203.5 during the period for which the license is issued or renewed;

(vii)  has not committed an act that is a ground for denial, suspension, or revocation as provided in Section 31A-23a-111;

(viii)  if a nonresident:

(A)  complies with Section 31A-23a-109; and

(B)  holds an active similar license in that person's state of residence;

(ix)  if an applicant for an individual title insurance producer or agency title insurance producer license, satisfies the requirements of Section 31A-23a-204;

(x)  if an applicant for a license to act as a life settlement provider or life settlement producer, satisfies the requirements of Section 31A-23a-117; and

(xi)  pays the applicable fees under Section 31A-3-103.

(2) (a)  This Subsection (2) applies to the following persons:

(i)  an applicant for a pending:

(A)  individual or agency producer license;

(B)  surplus lines producer license;

(C)  limited line producer license;

(D)  consultant license;

(E)  managing general agent license; or

(F)  reinsurance intermediary license; or

(ii)  a licensed:

(A)  individual or agency producer;

(B)  surplus lines producer;

(C)  limited line producer;

(D)  consultant;

(E)  managing general agent; or

(F)  reinsurance intermediary.

(b)  A person described in Subsection (2)(a) shall report to the commissioner:

(i)  an administrative action taken against the person, including a denial of a new or renewal license application:

(A)  in another jurisdiction; or

(B)  by another regulatory agency in this state; and

(ii)  a criminal prosecution taken against the person in any jurisdiction.

(c)  The report required by Subsection (2)(b) shall:

(i)  be filed:

(A)  at the time the person files the application for an individual or agency license; and

(B)  for an action or prosecution that occurs on or after the day on which the person files the application:

(I)  for an administrative action, within 30 days of the final disposition of the administrative action; or

(II)  for a criminal prosecution, within 30 days of the initial appearance before a court; and

(ii)  include a copy of the complaint or other relevant legal documents related to the action or prosecution described in Subsection (2)(b).

(3) (a)  The department may require a person applying for a license or for consent to engage in the business of insurance to submit to a criminal background check as a condition of receiving a license or consent.

(b)  A person, if required to submit to a criminal background check under Subsection (3)(a), shall:

(i)  submit a fingerprint card in a form acceptable to the department; and

(ii)  consent to a fingerprint background check by:

(A)  the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification; and

(B)  the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(c)  For a person who submits a fingerprint card and consents to a fingerprint background check under Subsection (3)(b), the department may request:

(i)  criminal background information maintained pursuant to Title 53, Chapter 10, Part 2, Bureau of Criminal Identification, from the Bureau of Criminal Identification; and

(ii)  complete Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal background checks through the national criminal history system.

(d)  Information obtained by the department from the review of criminal history records received under this Subsection (3) shall be used by the department for the purposes of:

(i)  determining if a person satisfies the character requirements under Section 31A-23a-107 for issuance or renewal of a license;

(ii)  determining if a person has failed to maintain the character requirements under Section 31A-23a-107; and

(iii)  preventing a person who violates the federal Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1033, from engaging in the business of insurance in the state.

(e)  If the department requests the criminal background information, the department shall:

(i)  pay to the Department of Public Safety the costs incurred by the Department of Public Safety in providing the department criminal background information under Subsection (3)(c)(i);

(ii)  pay to the Federal Bureau of Investigation the costs incurred by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in providing the department criminal background information under Subsection (3)(c)(ii); and

(iii)  charge the person applying for a license or for consent to engage in the business of insurance a fee equal to the aggregate of Subsections (3)(e)(i) and (ii).

(4)  To become a resident licensee in accordance with Section 31A-23a-104 and this section, a person licensed as one of the following in another state who moves to this state shall apply within 90 days of establishing legal residence in this state:

(a)  insurance producer;

(b)  surplus lines producer;

(c)  limited line producer;

(d)  consultant;

(e)  managing general agent; or

(f)  reinsurance intermediary.

(5) (a)  The commissioner may deny a license application for a license listed in Subsection (5)(b) if the person applying for the license, as to the license type and line of authority classification applied for under Section 31A-23a-106:

(i)  fails to satisfy the requirements as set forth in this section; or

(ii)  commits an act that is grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation as set forth in Section 31A-23a-111.

(b)  This Subsection (5) applies to the following licenses:

(i)  producer;

(ii)  surplus lines producer;

(iii)  limited line producer;

(iv)  consultant;

(v)  managing general agent; or

(vi)  reinsurance intermediary.

(6)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the commissioner may:

(a)  issue a license to an applicant for a license for a title insurance line of authority only with the concurrence of the Title and Escrow Commission; and

(b)  renew a license for a title insurance line of authority only with the concurrence of the Title and Escrow Commission.



Amended by Chapter 319, 2013 General Session

